Rhode Island, session 2025, SB830.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-33.1. Renewal of registration of leased vehicles.
Any vehicle leased for a period of thirty-six (36) months which is registered in two (2) year
cycles may be renewed for one additional year to coincide with the expiration of said lease and the
fees of renewal of registration shall be adjusted accordingly.
SECTION 2. Section 31-6-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-6 entitled "Registration
Fees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-6-1. Amount of registration and miscellaneous fees.
(a) The following registration fees shall be paid to the division of motor vehicles for the
registration of motor vehicles, trailers, semi-trailers, and school buses subject to registration for
each year of registration:
(1) For the registration of every automobile, when equipped with pneumatic tires, the gross
weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.): thirty dollars ($30.00).
(2) For the registration of every motor truck or tractor when equipped with pneumatic tires,
the gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.): thirty-four dollars
($34.00).
(3) For the registration of every automobile, motor truck or tractor, when equipped with
pneumatic tires, the gross weight of which is:

(i) More than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), but not more than five thousand pounds
(5,000 lbs.): forty dollars ($40.00);
(ii) More than five thousand pounds (5,000 lbs.), but not more than six thousand pounds
(6,000 lbs.): forty-eight dollars ($48.00);
(iii) More than six thousand pounds (6,000 lbs.), but not more than seven thousand pounds
(7,000 lbs.): fifty-six dollars ($56.00);
(iv) More than seven thousand pounds (7,000 lbs.), but not more than eight thousand
pounds (8,000 lbs.): sixty-four dollars ($64.00);
(v) More than eight thousand pounds (8,000 lbs.), but not more than nine thousand pounds
(9,000 lbs.): seventy dollars ($70.00);
(vi) More than nine thousand pounds (9,000 lbs.), but not more than ten thousand pounds
(10,000 lbs.): seventy-eight dollars ($78.00);
(vii) More than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.), but not more than twelve thousand
pounds (12,000 lbs.): one hundred six dollars ($106);
(viii) More than twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.), but not more than fourteen thousand
pounds (14,000 lbs.): one hundred twenty-four dollars ($124);
(ix) More than fourteen thousand pounds (14,000 lbs.), but not more than sixteen thousand
pounds (16,000 lbs.): one hundred forty dollars ($140);
(x) More than sixteen thousand pounds (16,000 lbs.), but not more than eighteen thousand
pounds (18,000 lbs.): one hundred fifty-eight dollars ($158);
(xi) More than eighteen thousand pounds (18,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty thousand
pounds (20,000 lbs.): one hundred seventy-six dollars ($176);
(xii) More than twenty thousand pounds (20,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-two
thousand pounds (22,000 lbs.): one hundred ninety-four dollars ($194);
(xiii) More than twenty-two thousand pounds (22,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-four
thousand pounds (24,000 lbs.): two hundred ten dollars ($210);
(xiv) More than twenty-four thousand pounds (24,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-six
thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.): two hundred thirty dollars ($230);
(xv) More than twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-eight
thousand pounds (28,000 lbs.): two hundred ninety-six dollars ($296);
(xvi) More than twenty-eight thousand pounds (28,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty
thousand pounds (30,000 lbs.): three hundred sixteen dollars ($316);
(xvii) More than thirty thousand pounds (30,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-two
thousand pounds (32,000 lbs.): four hundred and twenty-two dollars ($422);
LC002447 - Page 2 of 7

(xviii) More than thirty-two thousand pounds (32,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-four
thousand pounds (34,000 lbs.): four hundred and forty-eight dollars ($448);
(xix) More than thirty-four thousand pounds (34,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-six
thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.): four hundred and seventy-six dollars ($476);
(xx) More than thirty-six thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-eight
thousand pounds (38,000 lbs.): five hundred and two dollars ($502);
(xxi) More than thirty-eight thousand pounds (38,000 lbs.), but not more than forty
thousand pounds (40,000 lbs.): five hundred and twenty-eight dollars ($528);
(xxii) More than forty thousand pounds (40,000 lbs.), but not more than forty-two thousand
pounds (42,000 lbs.): five hundred and fifty-four dollars ($554);
(xxiii) More than forty-two thousand pounds (42,000 lbs.), but not more than forty-six
thousand pounds (46,000 lbs.): six hundred and eight dollars ($608);
(xxiv) More than forty-six thousand pounds (46,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty thousand
pounds (50,000 lbs.): six hundred and sixty dollars ($660);
(xxv) More than fifty thousand pounds (50,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty-four thousand
pounds (54,000 lbs.): seven hundred and twelve dollars ($712);
(xxvi) More than fifty-four thousand pounds (54,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty-eight
thousand pounds (58,000 lbs.): seven hundred and sixty-eight dollars ($768);
(xxvii) More than fifty-eight thousand pounds (58,000 lbs.), but not more than sixty-two
thousand pounds (62,000 lbs.): eight hundred and sixteen dollars ($816);
(xxviii) More than sixty-two thousand pounds (62,000 lbs.), but not more than sixty-six
thousand pounds (66,000 lbs.): eight hundred and seventy-six dollars ($876);
(xxix) More than sixty-six thousand pounds (66,000 lbs.), but not more than seventy
thousand pounds (70,000 lbs.): nine hundred and twenty-four dollars ($924);
(xxx) More than seventy thousand pounds (70,000 lbs.), but not more than seventy-four
thousand pounds (74,000 lbs.): nine hundred and seventy-two dollars ($972);
(xxxi) Over seventy-four thousand pounds (74,000 lbs.): nine hundred and seventy-two
dollars ($972), plus twenty-four dollars ($24.00) per two thousand pounds (2,000 lbs.) gross
weight.
(4) For the registration of every semi-trailer to be used with a truck-tractor, as defined in §
31-1-4(f), shall be as follows: an annual fee of twelve dollars ($12.00) for a one-year registration;
for multi-year registrations the fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a five-year (5) registration; and
eighty dollars ($80.00) for an eight-year (8) registration. However, when in use, the weight of the
resulting semi-trailer unit and its maximum carrying capacity shall not exceed the gross weight of
LC002447 - Page 3 of 7

the original semi-trailer unit from which the gross weight of the tractor was determined. A
registration certificate and registration plate shall be issued for each semi-trailer so registered.
There shall be no refund of payment of such fee, except that when a plate is returned prior to ninety
(90) days before the effective date of that year’s registration, the pro rate amount, based on the
unused portion of the multi-year registration plate period at time of surrender, shall be refunded. A
multi-year semi-trailer registration may be transferred to another semi-trailer subject to the
provisions and fee set forth in § 31-6-11. Thirty percent (30%) of the semi-trailer registration fee
shall be retained by the division of motor vehicles to defray the costs of implementation of the
international registration plan (IRP) and fleet registration section.
(5) For the registration of every automobile, motor truck, or tractor, when equipped with
other than pneumatic tires, there shall be added to the above gross weight fees a charge of ten cents
(10¢) for each one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) of gross weight.
(6) For the registration of every public bus, the rates provided for motor vehicles for hire
plus two dollars ($2.00) for each passenger that bus is rated to carry, the rating to be determined by
the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.
(7) For the registration of every motorcycle, or motor-driven cycle, thirteen dollars
($13.00). Three dollars ($3.00) from that sum shall be turned over to the department of education
to assist in the payment of the cost of the motorcycle driver’s education program as enumerated in
§ 31-10.1-1.1.
(8) For the registration of every trailer, not including semi-trailers used with a truck-tractor
as defined in § 31-1-4(d), with a gross weight of three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) or less, five
dollars ($5.00). Trailers with a gross weight of more than three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) shall
be assessed a registration fee of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per thousand pounds (1,000 lbs.).
(9) The annual registration fee for a motor vehicle, commonly described as a boxcar and/or
locomotive, and used only by La Societe Des 40 Hommes et 8 Chevaux for civic demonstration,
parades, convention purposes, or social welfare work, shall be two dollars ($2.00).
(10) For the registration of every motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer owned by any
department or agency of any city or town or district, provided the name of the city or town or
district or state department or agency owning the same shall be plainly printed on two (2) sides of
the vehicle, two dollars ($2.00).
(11) For the registration of motor vehicles used for racing, fifteen dollars ($15.00).
(12) For every duplicate registration certificate, seventeen dollars ($17.00).
(13) For every certified copy of a registration certificate or application, ten dollars ($10.00).
(14) For every certificate assigning a special identification number or mark as provided in
LC002447 - Page 4 of 7

§ 31-3-37, one dollar ($1.00).
(15) For every replacement of number plates or additional pair of number plates, without
changing the number, thirty dollars ($30.00).
(16) For the registration of every farm vehicle, used in farming as provided in § 31-3-31:
ten dollars ($10.00).
(17) For the registration of antique motor vehicles, five dollars ($5.00).
(18) For the registration of a suburban vehicle, when used as a pleasure vehicle and the
gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), the same rates as charged
in subsection (1) of this section shall be applicable and when used as a commercial vehicle and the
gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), the same rates as
provided in subsection (2) of this section shall be applicable. The rates in subsection (3) of this
section shall be applicable when the suburban vehicle has a gross weight of more than four thousand
pounds (4,000 lbs.), regardless of the use of the vehicle.
(19) For the registration of every motor bus that is used exclusively under contract with a
political subdivision or school district of the state for the transportation of school children, twenty-
five dollars ($25); provided that the motor bus may also be used for the transportation of persons
to and from church and Sunday school services, and for the transportation of children to and from
educational or recreational projects sponsored by a city or town or by any association or
organization supported wholly or in part by public or private donations for charitable purposes,
without the payment of additional registration fee.
(20) For the registration of every motorized bicycle, ten dollars ($10.00).
(21) For the registration of every motorized tricycle, ten dollars ($10.00).
(22) For the replacement of number plates with a number change, twenty dollars ($20.00).
(23) For the initial issuance and each reissuance of fully reflective plates, as required by §§
31-3-10, 31-3-32, and 31-3-33, an additional eight dollars ($8.00); provided, however, for the initial
issuance of new license plates as required by § 31-3-33(c) that feature the 2022 approved design,
the fee shall be waived when the plate is issued for a vehicle with an existing registration.
(24) For the issuance of a trip permit under the International Registration Plan, twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) per vehicle. The division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue seventy-two-hour
(72) trip permits for vehicles required to be registered in the International Registration Plan that
have not been apportioned with the state of Rhode Island.
(25) For the issuance of a hunter’s permit under the International Registration Plan, twenty-
five dollars ($25.00) per vehicle. The division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue hunter’s
permits for motor vehicles based in the state of Rhode Island and otherwise required to be registered
LC002447 - Page 5 of 7

in the International Registration Plan. These permits are valid for thirty (30) days.
(26) For the registration of a specially adapted motor vehicle necessary to transport a family
member with a disability for personal, noncommercial use, a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) assessed.
(b) In the event that the registrant of a vehicle, that is the subject of an agreement for
conditional sale or lease, with right of purchase upon performance of stated conditions and
immediate right of possession vested in the vendee or lessee, voluntarily cancels the registrant's
registration within the period of registration, the division of motor vehicles shall issue a credit to
the registrant equal to the amount of the unused portion of the registration fee paid, which credit
shall be applied to future registration fees incurred by the registrant.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002447
========
LC002447 - Page 6 of 7